Illinois, session 104th, SB146.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 5adding Section 246 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 5/246 new)7    Sec. 246. Small business property tax relief credit.8    (a) For taxable years that end on or after December 31, 92025 and end on or before December 31, 2029, each qualified 10small business is entitled to a credit against the taxes 11imposed by subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 in an amount 12equal to the lesser of (i) 10% of the property taxes paid by 13the qualified small business during the taxable year for 14eligible real property or (ii) $1,500. 15    (b) In no event shall a credit under this Section reduce 16the taxpayer's liability to less than zero. If the amount of 17the credit exceeds the tax liability for the year, the excess 18may be carried forward and applied to the tax liability of the 195 taxable years following the excess credit year. The tax 20credit shall be applied to the earliest year for which there is 21a tax liability. If there are credits for more than one year 22that are available to offset a liability, the earlier credit 23shall be applied first.   SB0146- 2 -LRB104 03535 HLH 13558 b1    (c) If the taxpayer is a partnership or Subchapter S 2corporation, the credit is allowed to pass through to the 3partners and shareholders as provided in Section 251. 4    (d) This Section is exempt from the provisions of Section 5250. 6    (e) As used in this Section: 7    "Eligible real property" means property located in 8Illinois that meets the following criteria: 9        (1) the taxpayer has an ownership interest in the 10    property, whether legal, equitable, or as a lessee, and 11    the taxpayer is liable for the payment of property taxes 12    on the property; 13        (2) the property is used to conduct the taxpayer's 14    business operations; and 15        (3) the property is not residential. 16    "Qualified small business" means a sole proprietorship, 17partnership, corporation, joint venture, association, or 18cooperative that conducts business in Illinois, employs fewer 19than 50 employees in the State during the taxable year, and is 20current with all State and federal tax obligations as of the 21last day of the taxable year.  22    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 23becoming law.